Ohio, session 136, HB702.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO: Section 1. That section 101.27 of the Revised Code be amended to read as follows: Sec. 101.27. (A)(1) Every member of the senate, except the members elected president, president pro tempore, assistant president pro tempore, majority whip, minority leader, assistant minority leader, minority whip, and assistant minority whip, shall receive as compensation a salary of sixty-three thousand seven dollars a year during the senator's term of office. Every member of the house of representatives, except the members elected speaker, speaker pro tempore, assistant speaker pro tempore, majority floor leader, assistant majority floor leader, majority whip, minority leader, assistant minority leader, minority whip, and assistant minority whip, shall receive as compensation a salary of sixty-three thousand seven dollars a year during the representative's term of office. Such salaries shall be paid in equal monthly installments during such term. All monthly payments shall be made on or before the fifth day of each month. Upon the death of any member of the general assembly during the member's term of office, any unpaid salary due such member for the remainder of the member's term shall be paid to the member's surviving spouse, children, mother, or father, in the order in which the relationship is set forth in this section in monthly installments. (2) Each (2)(a) Except as provided in division (A)(2)(b) of this section, each member shall receive a travel reimbursement per mile each way, at the same mileage rate allowed for the reimbursement of travel expenses of state agents as provided by rule of the director of budget and management pursuant to division (B) of section 126.31 of the Revised Code, for mileage not more than once a week during the session for travel incurred by a member from and to the member's place of residence, by the most direct highway route of public travel to and from the seat of government, to be paid quarterly on the last day of March, June, September, and December of each year. (b) A member shall not seek reimbursement under division (A)(2)(a) of this section for any week during which the member charges the member's plug-in hybrid electric motor vehicle or battery electric motor vehicle, as those terms are defined in section 4501.01 of the Revised Code, using a vehicle charging station in a parking facility affiliated with the Vern Riffe center for government and the arts or the Ohio statehouse, both in Columbus. (3) The member of the senate elected president and the member of the house of representatives elected speaker shall each receive as compensation a salary of ninety-eight thousand two hundred fourteen dollars a year during the president's or speaker's term of office. The member of the senate elected president pro tempore, the member of the senate elected minority leader, the member of the house of representatives elected speaker pro tempore, and the member of the house of representatives elected minority leader shall each receive as compensation a salary of eighty-nine thousand six hundred twelve dollars a year during the member's term of office. The member of the house of representatives elected majority floor leader and the member of the senate elected assistant president pro tempore shall each receive as compensation a salary of eighty-four thousand four hundred ten dollars a year during the member's term of office. The member of the senate elected assistant minority leader and the member of the house of representatives elected assistant minority leader shall each receive as compensation a salary of eighty-one thousand eight hundred fifteen dollars a year during the member's term of office. The member of the senate elected majority whip and the member of the house of representatives elected assistant majority floor leader shall each receive a salary of seventy-nine thousand two hundred sixteen dollars a year during the member's term of office. The member of the senate elected minority whip, the member or members of the house of representatives elected majority whip, and the member of the house of representatives elected minority whip shall each receive as compensation a salary of seventy-four thousand twenty dollars a year during the member's term of office. The member of the house of representatives elected assistant minority whip and the member of the senate elected assistant minority whip shall each receive a salary of sixty-five thousand nine hundred sixteen dollars a year during the member's term of office. (4) The member of the house of representatives elected assistant speaker pro tempore shall receive a salary of ninety-nine thousand nine hundred three dollars and ninety cents a year during the member's term of office. (5) The chairperson of the finance committee of each house shall receive an additional sum of thirteen thousand five hundred dollars annually. The chairperson of each standing committee of each house other than the finance committee shall receive an additional sum of nine thousand dollars annually. The chairperson of each standing subcommittee of a finance committee shall receive an additional sum of nine thousand dollars annually. The vice-chairperson of the finance committee of each house shall receive an additional sum of seven thousand five hundred dollars annually. The ranking minority member of the finance committee of each house shall receive an additional sum of nine thousand dollars annually. The ranking minority member of each standing subcommittee of a finance committee shall receive an additional sum of six thousand seven hundred fifty dollars annually. The chairperson of each standing subcommittee of each house other than a standing subcommittee of the finance committee shall receive an additional sum of six thousand seven hundred fifty dollars annually. The vice-chairperson and ranking minority member of each standing committee of each house other than the finance committee shall each receive an additional sum of six thousand seven hundred fifty dollars annually. Except for the ranking minority member of each standing subcommittee of a finance committee, the ranking minority member of each standing subcommittee of each house shall receive an additional sum of three thousand two hundred fifty dollars annually. No member may receive more than one additional sum for serving as chairperson, vice-chairperson, or ranking minority member of a standing committee or standing subcommittee, regardless of the number of standing committees or standing subcommittees on which the member serves as chairperson, vice-chairperson, or ranking minority member. (6) If a member is absent without leave, or is not excused on the member's return, there shall be deducted from the member's compensation twenty dollars for each day's absence. (B)(1) The salary amounts under divisions (A)(1) and (3) of this section are for calendar year 2019. The salary amount under division (A)(4) of this section is for calendar year 2025. (2) Each calendar year from 2020 through 2028 the salary amounts under divisions (A)(1) and (3) of this section, and each calendar year from 2026 through 2028 the salary amount under division (A)(4) of this section, shall be increased as follows: (a) In calendar year 2020, by four per cent; (b) In calendar year 2021, by three per cent; (c) In calendar year 2022, by one and three-quarters per cent; (d) In calendar year 2023, by one and three-quarters per cent; (e) In calendar year 2024, by one and three-quarters per cent; (f) In calendar year 2025, by one and three-quarters per cent; (g) In calendar year 2026, by one and three-quarters per cent; (h) In calendar year 2027, by one and three-quarters per cent; (i) In calendar year 2028, by one and three-quarters per cent. (C) As used in this section, "finance committee" means the finance committee of the senate and the finance committee of the house of representatives. Section 2. That existing section 101.27 of the Revised Code is hereby repealed. Section 3. This act shall be known as the Fairness in Mileage Reimbursement Act.